California, session 20252026, SB962.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known as, and may be cited as, the Agent Joshua Byrd Memorial Act.SEC. 2. Section 25258 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:25258. (a) An authorized emergency vehicle operating under the conditions specified in Section 21055 may display a flashing white light from a gaseous discharge lamp designed and used for the purpose of controlling official traffic control signals.(b) (1) An authorized emergency vehicle used by a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 of, subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (i) of Section 830.2 of, subdivision (n) of Section 830.3 of, subdivision (b) of Section 830.31 of, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.32 of, Section 830.33 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.36 of, subdivision (a) of Section 830.4 of, Section 830.6 of, or a probation officer or parole officer, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 830.5 of, the Penal Code, in the performance of the peace officer’s duties, may, in addition, display a steady or flashing blue warning light visible from the front, sides, or rear of the vehicle.(2) (A) Before a probation officer operates an emergency vehicle with a blue warning light, the officer shall complete a four-hour classroom training course on the operation of emergency vehicles that is certified by the Standards and Training for Corrections Division of the Board of State and Community Corrections.(B) Before (i) Upon an appropriation from the Legislature, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may install a blue warning light on an emergency vehicle operated by a parole officer.(ii) Before a parole officer operates an emergency vehicle with a blue warning light, the officer shall complete a four-hour classroom training course on the operation of emergency vehicles that is certified by the Commission on Correctional Peace Officer Standards and Training.(3) This subdivision does not expand any existing authority of a probation officer or parole officer to conduct a high-speed vehicle pursuit, nor does it change any existing training requirements for a high-speed vehicle pursuit.(c) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a vehicle shall not be equipped with a device that emits any illumination or radiation that is designed or used for the purpose of controlling official traffic control signals.